Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 7. Bond Issues

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d Public Securities and Obligations § 1 et seq.; 68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 80 to 88.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 362 to 392; 79 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 522 to 556.

§ 21-13-701.
Submission of question to electors authorized; purposes for which indebtedness may be created; required public hearing on bonding proposition; reserve fund for maintenance required.

The board of trustees of a school district may, after conducting at least two (2) public hearings as required under subsection (c) of this section and subject to subsection (d) of this section, submit to the qualified electors of the district on a date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

, the question of creating an indebtedness for the purpose of:

Acquiring or improving land;

Acquiring or erecting buildings;

Enlarging, improving, remodeling, repairing or adding to buildings;

Equipping and furnishing buildings;

Repair and maintenance; and

Any combination of the above.

The purposes for which an indebtedness may be created shall be broadly construed. It is the intention of the legislature that school districts be empowered to create indebtedness under this section for any purpose which, directly or indirectly, enables the district to provide facilities which are in excess of the statewide standards for the adequacy of school buildings and facilities.

Prior to submitting a bonding proposition to district voters in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the school district board of trustees shall hold at least two (2) public hearings within the district at which the board provides an explanation of the need to obtain district funding for building and facility features that are in excess of state standards for buildings and facilities.

In addition to subsection (a) of this section and for any bond proposition submitted to district voters on or after July 1, 2007, the proposition shall provide that not less than three percent (3%) of bond proceeds be used for the creation of reserves or sinking funds for the maintenance and repair of any buildings or facilities or any building or facility features in excess of state building and facility adequacy standards which are to be constructed or otherwise acquired through the bond issue.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 1, § 1; 1897, ch. 41, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 570; C.S. 1910, § 2028; C.S. 1920, § 2365; Laws 1921, ch. 149, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 99-1001, 99-1002; C.S. 1945, §§ 67-401, 67-402; Laws 1955, ch. 191, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-76, 21-77; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 253; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-253; Laws 1979, ch. 73, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1999, ch. 170, § 201; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 1; 2007, ch. 35, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to bonds, for construction projects for the University of Wyoming, see §§

21-17-402

through

21-17-450

.

As to bond issues with regard to community college districts, see §§

21-18-313

through

21-18-315

.

As to conduct of bond elections, see chapter 21 of title 22.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), inserted “and subject to subsection (d) of this section” in the introductory language; redesignated former (v) as (vi) and inserted (v); added (d); and made a related change.

Constitution requires election. —

School districts are “subdivisions” of a county within meaning of art. 16, § 4, Wyo. Const., providing that no debt in excess of taxes for current year shall be created by any county or subdivision thereof unless proposition to create debt shall have been submitted to vote of people. West v. School Dist. No. 9, West v. School Dist., 37 Wyo. 36, 258 P. 583,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1927).

Bonded indebtedness. —

School districts are not required to have reached bonded indebtedness of ninety percent or more of their constitutional debt limitation imposed under art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const., in order to receive state assistance for those capital construction projects identified in the department of education's study of school construction needs. Snell v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2004 WY 19, 86 P.3d 248,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2004).

Bonds may be negotiated at lower interest rate than that submitted. —

Fact that in proposition submitted to electors rate of interest was stated as 4%, and bonds were later negotiated at 31/2%, did not affect validity of the bonds nor notice of election, as board was justified in effecting a saving for taxpayers if possible. Jewett v. School Dist., 49 Wyo. 277, 54 P.2d 546,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1936).

Use of funds. —

Under provisions authorizing school boards to create bonded indebtedness for erection or enlargement of school buildings, there is impliedly included power to use portion of proceeds to purchase and install equipment necessary for its use, and bonds issued for such purpose cannot be affected by fact that school board might thereafter, without participation of bondholders, use part of the money for purposes which might not be lawful. Jewett v. School Dist., 49 Wyo. 277, 54 P.2d 546,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1936).

Where portion of voted bond proceeds of a district is available for furnishings without exceeding limit fixed by statute and constitutional provisions, it can be used for purchase of furniture. Hendricks v. School Dist., 44 Wyo. 204, 10 P.2d 970,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1932).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see IV Wyo. L.J. 227.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Inclusion of several structures or units as affecting validity of submission of proposition to voters at bond election, 4 ALR2d 617.

Inclusion of tax-exempt property in determining value of taxable property for debt limit purposes, 30 ALR2d 903.

§ 21-13-702.
Construction of school building on leased land; state and its agencies authorized to enter into leases.

A school building may be constructed on leased land provided that the lease shall be for a term of years not less than the economic life of the building as determined by the board. The state of Wyoming and any board, commission, department, corporation, instrumentality, or agency thereof may enter into such a lease with a school district notwithstanding any other provision of law limiting the term of such a lease.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 254; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-254.

§ 21-13-703.
Limits on indebtedness.

Each school district actually and physically operating within its boundaries a school shall have a limit on outstanding indebtedness of ten percent (10%) of the assessed value of the taxable property therein. Nothing in this section shall be construed as permitting any combination of school districts embracing common territory to incur a bonded indebtedness of more than ten percent (10%) of the assessed value of the taxable property therein. The amount in any sinking fund available for the payment of outstanding indebtedness may be deducted for the purpose of computing the debt-incurring power of such district. For this purpose, any general assessment for a particular district shall become effective when the county assessor shall have received notice from the state board of equalization of its final approval of the county valuations; provided, however, that if the county assessor receives such notice after the district has entered into an enforceable contract for the sale of bonds, a new lower assessed valuation shall not become effective until the day following the date of delivery of such bonds.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 149, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 99-1002; C.S. 1945, § 67-402; Laws 1955, ch. 191, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-77; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 255; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-255; 1999, ch. 170, § 201.

Cross references. —

As to general powers and purpose of state board of equalization, see §

39-11-102

.1.

Property excluded in determining assessed value. —

For purpose of issuing bonds, real property within school district sold to county for delinquent taxes for which certificate of purchase has been issued to county cannot be considered in determining amount of assessed value of property in district. Williams v. School Dist., 56 Wyo. 1, 102 P.2d 48,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1940).

§ 21-13-704.
Sale of bonds generally.

If a proposed issue of bonds has been approved in the election and issuance thereof has been authorized by the school district board of trustees as provided by this article, the bonds shall thereafter at one (1) time or from time to time be sold at public or private sale. All costs and expenses incident to the issue and sale of the bonds may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds. If the bonds are to be sold at public sale, the school district board of trustees shall give notice of sale by at least one (1) insertion of such notice in some newspaper of general circulation in the district of its intention to sell the bonds. The notice shall briefly describe the bonds and the time and place where the sale thereof will take place. If there is no newspaper of general circulation in the district, the board may publish the notice of sale in any newspaper published in the county seat of any county in which the district is wholly or partially located. Publication shall be made not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days prior to the date designated for the sale of the bonds.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 1, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 572; C.S. 1910, § 2030; C.S. 1920, § 2367; R.S. 1931, § 99-1004; C.S. 1945, § 67-404; W.S. 1957, § 21-79; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 265; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-265; Laws 1981, ch. 89, § 1.

§ 21-13-705.
Printing and numbering of bonds.

After ascertaining the best terms upon, and the lowest interest at which said bonds can be sold, the board of trustees shall cause said bonds to be suitably printed or lithographed, with coupons, if any, attached, and thereafter shall have said bonds consecutively numbered and otherwise properly prepared and executed.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 266; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-266.

§ 21-13-706.
Execution, form and contents of bonds.

Said bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the board of trustees and countersigned by the county treasurer. The coupons, if any, shall be signed by the county treasurer. The clerk of the board shall endorse a certificate upon every bond, that the same is issued pursuant to law and is within the lawful debt limit of the district. The county treasurer may authorize his deputy to sign any bond or coupon on his behalf. The board of trustees may authorize another member of the board to sign any bond or certificate in place of the chairman or clerk. It shall not be necessary for any bond to bear the seal of the district. Said bonds and coupons shall otherwise be in such form as the board may determine; provided, that the board may, at its option, utilize a statutory form of bond which shall include the following details:

The name of the district and the date of the bond;

The principal amount thereof and interest rate or rates applicable thereto;

The place or places and time or times of payment of principal and interest;

The prior redemption option, if any;

A recital that the bond is one of a series approved at an election held for that purpose, that the total indebtedness of the district does not exceed the lawful debt limit of the district; and that the bond has been issued under the authority of, and in full compliance with, and for a purpose authorized by, the constitution and this article.

A bond delivered to the purchaser thereof in the optional statutory form shall:

Be payable in lawful money of the United States of America without deduction for exchange or collection charges;

Be conclusively presumed to have been issued for value;

Be payable upon presentation and surrender of the bond and the attached coupons as they severally become due;

If not paid upon presentation at maturity, continue to draw interest until the principal thereof is paid in full;

Be presumed to have been issued by the proper officers of the district under and by virtue of and in full conformity with the constitution of the state of Wyoming, this article, any amendments thereto, and all other laws thereunto enabling; and

Be incontestable as hereafter provided.

Any resolution of a school district board of trustees authorizing bonds may provide that each bond therein authorized shall recite that it is issued under the authority of this article. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all the provisions hereof, and all bonds issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 1, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 571; C.S. 1910, § 2029; C.S. 1920, § 2366; R.S. 1931, § 99-1003; C.S. 1945, § 67-403; W.S. 1957, § 21-78; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 267; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-267; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 23; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Challenge to use of funds. —

In a challenge to a school district's use of funds obtained from the sale of bonds to construct school facilities, the challengers' claim was not barred as nothing in this statute prevented the challengers from claiming the proceeds from that sale could not be used as proposed by the school district. Snell v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2004 WY 19, 86 P.3d 248,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 21-13-707.
Record of bonds sold and delivered.

A record of any bonds sold and delivered by the district shall be kept by the county treasurer in a public book provided for that purpose, and therein shall be stated the number, date, amount, time and place of payment, rate of interest, number of coupons attached, if any, and any other proper description thereof for future identification.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 1, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 571; C.S. 1910, § 2029; C.S. 1920, § 2366; R.S. 1931, § 99-1003; C.S. 1945, § 67-403; W.S. 1957, § 21-78; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 268; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-268.

§ 21-13-708.
Terms of bonds; negotiability.

Bonds issued by school districts pursuant to the provisions of this article shall bear interest payable annually or semiannually, and evidenced by one (1) or two (2) sets of coupons, if any, except that the first coupon may evidence interest for a period not in excess of one (1) year, and the bonds may be in one (1) or more series, may bear a date or dates, may mature at a time or times not exceeding twenty-five (25) years from their respective dates, may be in a denomination or denominations, may be payable in a medium of payment, in a place or places, within or without the state, including, but not limited to the office of the county treasurer of a county in which the district is wholly or partially located, may carry registration privileges, may be subject to prior redemption in advance of maturity in an order, or by lot, or otherwise, at a time or times with or without premium, may bear privileges for reissuance in the same or other denominations, may be so reissued (without modification of maturities and interest rates), and may be in a form, either coupon or registered, as may be provided by resolution of the school district board of trustees. Except as the board may otherwise provide, the bonds and interest coupons attached thereto, if any, shall be fully negotiable, within the meaning of and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities [§§ 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-603]. The holder of a bond or coupon, by accepting the bond or coupon, is conclusively deemed to have agreed that the bond or coupon (except as otherwise provided) is and shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 269; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-269; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 24; 1981, ch. 89, § 1; ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Rate of interest. —

Fact that in proposition submitted to electors rate of interest was stated as 4%, and bonds were later negotiated at 31/2%, did not affect validity of the bonds nor notice of election, as board was justified in effecting a saving for taxpayers if possible. Jewett v. School Dist., 49 Wyo. 277, 54 P.2d 546,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1936).

Maturity dates. —

Bonds issued for erecting or enlarging school buildings must mature in 25 years, and where school board provided for maturity at rate of $1,000.00 a year for first 15 years and $2,000.00 a year thereafter, last two installments falling due the 26th and 27th years, board might change last four maturities to $3,000 a year. Jewett v. School Dist., 49 Wyo. 277, 54 P.2d 546,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 21-13-709.
How bonds to mature.

The various annual maturities shall commence not later than the third year after the date of the bonds. All bonds shall mature serially, at the option of the board of trustees, in substantially equal annual installments of principal, or upon an amortization plan for the bonds of said series, or upon an amortization plan for the proposed bonds and all outstanding bonds of the district, or in any other manner as the board may determine.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 270; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-270.

§ 21-13-710.
Sale to be conducted by board of trustees; disposition of proceeds.

The sale of the bonds shall be conducted by the school district board of trustees. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the school district treasurer for deposit in the school district treasury.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 1, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 572; C.S. 1910, § 2030; C.S. 1920, § 2367; R.S. 1931, § 99-1004; C.S. 1945, § 67-404; W.S. 1957, § 21-79; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 271; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-271; Laws 1979, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 21-13-711.
Price of bonds; bids.

The bonds may be sold at, above or below the par value thereof as determined by the board of trustees, but the bonds shall be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate for the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate approved by the voters in the election authorizing the bonds. The board is authorized to reject any and all bids and to waive any informality or irregularity in any bid.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 1, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 572; C.S. 1910, § 2030; C.S. 1920, § 2367; R.S. 1931, § 99-1004; C.S. 1945, § 67-404; W.S. 1957, § 21-79; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 272; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-272; Laws 1981, ch. 89, § 1.

§ 21-13-712.
Security for payment of bonds.

The full faith, credit, and all taxable property lying within the school district are solemnly pledged for the payment of the principal and the interest of all bonds issued pursuant to this article.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 1, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 573; C.S. 1910, § 2031; C.S. 1920, § 2368; R.S. 1931, § 99-1005; C.S. 1945, 67-405; W.S. 1957, § 21-80; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 273; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-273.

§ 21-13-713.
Tax levy.

Subject to W.S.

21-15-105

, the board of county commissioners shall cause to be levied annually upon all taxable property of the school district, in addition to other authorized taxes, a sufficient sum to pay the principal and interest on school district bonds as the payments thereon become due. All taxes for the repayment of bonded indebtedness shall be levied, assessed, and collected in the same manner as other taxes for school purposes. The taxes shall be levied in the manner prescribed above until the principal and interest of the bonds are fully paid.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 1, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 574; C.S. 1910, § 2032; C.S. 1920, § 2369; R.S. 1931, § 99-1006; C.S. 1945, § 67-406; W.S. 1957, § 21-81; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 274; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-274; Laws 1986, ch. 122, § 2.

School district not entitled to eleventh amendment immunity. —

Although a school district obtains more than 1/4 of its funds from the state of Wyoming, the school district on balance is not entitled to an eleventh amendment immunity as an arm of the state of Wyoming. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Tax not subject to 12 mill limitation. —

Under statute relative to levying tax upon taxable property within school district to pay interest on its bonds and to provide sinking fund for their redemption at maturity, tax so levied is not a tax for “county revenue” within art. 15, § 5, Wyo. Const., limiting tax for county revenue to 12 mills on the dollar. McCague Inv. Co. v. Mallin, 25 Wyo. 373, 170 P. 763,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1918).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see IV Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 21-13-714.
Payment of bonds before collection of tax levy.

In the event that the tax for the payment of the principal or interest on any bonds issued at any time under the provisions of this article is not levied or collected in time to meet such payment, the principal or interest shall be paid out of any monies in the general or other funds of the district, and the monies so used for such payment shall be repaid to the fund from which so taken, out of the first monies collected from district taxes.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 275; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-275.

§ 21-13-715.
County treasurer to pay bonds and report payment to board of trustees.

The county treasurer shall pay the principal and interest of any bonds issued under this article by such school district, when the same becomes due, and all amounts so paid must be reported to the school district board of trustees at its next meeting thereafter.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 1, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 576; C.S. 1910, § 2034; C.S. 1920, § 2371; R.S. 1931, § 99-1008; C.S. 1945, § 67-408; W.S. 1957, § 21-83; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 276; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-276.

§ 21-13-716.
Penalty for misappropriation of funds by trustees.

If any member of the school district board of trustees fraudulently fails or refuses to pay into the proper county treasury the money arising from the sale of any bonds provided for by this article, he shall be deemed guilty of a felony; and upon conviction thereof, be punished by imprisonment in the state penitentiary for a term of not less than one (1) year, nor more than ten (10) years.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 1, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 578; C.S. 1910, § 2036; C.S. 1920, § 2373; R.S. 1931, § 99-1010; C.S. 1945, § 67-410; W.S. 1957, § 21-85; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 277; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-277.

§ 21-13-717.
Additional surety by county treasurer.

The school district board of trustees shall require the said county treasurer to give said district a separate bond in such sum as said board may deem proper, with two (2) or more sufficient sureties, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties required of him by this article, and the faithful accounting for the monies deposited with him and realized from the sale of said bonds, as herein provided for, and such bonds shall be approved by said board and shall be and remain in the custody of said district board.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 1, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 580; C.S. 1910, § 2038; C.S. 1920, § 2375; R.S. 1931, § 99-1012; C.S. 1945, § 67-412; W.S. 1957, § 21-87; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 278; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-278.

§ 21-13-718.
Bonds valid though signers cease to hold office.

The bonds and any coupons bearing the signatures of the officers in office at the time of the signing thereof, shall be valid and binding obligations of the school district, notwithstanding that before delivery and/or payment thereof, any or all of the persons whose signatures or facsimiles appear thereon shall have ceased to fill respective offices.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 279; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-279.

§ 21-13-719.
Use of facsimile signatures.

Any person herein authorized or permitted to sign any bonds or interest coupons, may utilize a facsimile signature in lieu of his manual signature provided that the signature on the certificate required by section 8, article 16, of the constitution shall be manually executed. Such officer may adopt as and for his own signature the facsimile signature of his predecessor in office in the event that such facsimile signature, having been executed by an officer then authorized to do so, appears upon the bonds or coupons, if any. It shall not be necessary for such officer to file any certificate with the secretary of state or any other board or officer.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 280; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-280.

§ 21-13-720.
Refunding bonds.

Any bonds heretofore or hereafter issued by a school district of this state may be refunded, without an election, by the district which issued said bonds, or any district which has assumed the obligation of said bonds in the manner and subject to the conditions provided by the General Obligation Public Securities Refunding Law [§§

16-5-101

through

16-5-119

], as from time to time amended.

History.

Laws 1893, ch. 10, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 581; C.S. 1910, § 2039; C.S. 1920, § 2376; Laws 1931, ch. 51, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 99-1013; C.S. 1945, § 67-501; W.S. 1957, § 21-88; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 282; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-282.

§ 21-13-721.
Validation of outstanding bonds, acts and proceedings.

All bonds of any school district in this state outstanding on the effective date of this article, the right to the payment of which has not been barred by any pertinent statute of limitations, and all acts and proceedings heretofore had or taken, or purportedly had or taken by or on behalf of such district under law or under color of law preliminary to and in the authorization, execution, sale, issuance and payment of all such bonds, are hereby validated, ratified, approved and confirmed, including but not necessarily limited to the terms, provisions, conditions, and covenants of any resolution appertaining thereto, the redemption of bonds before maturity and provisions therefor, and the levy and collection of taxes to pay such bonds, notwithstanding any lack of power, authority, or otherwise, and notwithstanding any defects and irregularities in such bonds, act, and proceedings, and in such authorization, execution, sale, issuance, and payment. Such outstanding bonds are and shall be binding, legal, valid, and enforceable obligations of the school district issuing them in accordance with their terms and the authorizing proceedings.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 283; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-283.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 291, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved February 25, 1969.